Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 2

Dogs Killing Livestock

44-17-201. Owners of dogs are liable for livestock killed.

Where any dog shall kill, or in any manner damage, any livestock in this state, the owner or harborer of such dog shall be liable, in an action for damage, to the owner of such livestock.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 45, § 1; Shan., § 2871; mod. Code 1932, § 5105; Acts 1949, ch. 262, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5105; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-101.

Cited: Henry v. Roach, 41 Tenn. App. 289, 293 S.W.2d 480, 1956 Tenn. App. LEXIS 169 (1956); McAbee v. Daniel, 60 Tenn. App. 239, 445 S.W.2d 917, 1968 Tenn. App. LEXIS 285 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1968); Blair v. Jackson, 526 S.W.2d 120, 1973 Tenn. App. LEXIS 245 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1973).

44-17-202. Ignorance of dog's habits is no defense.

Ignorance of the vicious habits or character of the dog on the part of its owner shall be no defense in actions arising under §44-17-201.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 45, § 2; Shan., § 2872; Code 1932, § 5106; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-102.

Cited: Birdsong v. Wilkinson, 13 Tenn. App. 276, 1931 Tenn. App. LEXIS 70 (1931); Henry v. Roach, 41 Tenn. App. 289, 293 S.W.2d 480, 1956 Tenn. App. LEXIS 169 (1956); McAbee v. Daniel, 60 Tenn. App. 239, 445 S.W.2d 917, 1968 Tenn. App. LEXIS 285 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1968); Blair v. Jackson, 526 S.W.2d 120, 1973 Tenn. App. LEXIS 245 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1973).

44-17-203. No damages recoverable for killing or injuring such dog.

In an action for damages against a person for killing or injuring a dog, satisfactory proof that the dog had been or was killing or worrying livestock constitutes a good defense to such action.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 45, § 3; Shan., § 2873; Code 1932, § 5107; Acts 1949, ch. 262, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5107; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-103.

Cross-References. No liability for killing proud bitch at large, §44-8-411.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 5.